District of Columbia statutes.
43-101

Incorporation; powers.

When 5 or more persons shall associate themselves together for the purpose of forming a cemetery association in the District, such persons shall have the power to adopt a corporate name, and by that name shall be known as a body corporate, and by that name shall have perpetual succession and be invested with all powers, rights, privileges, liabilities, and immunities incident to corporations, and may have a common seal, and may alter or change the same at their pleasure.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1294, ch. 854, § 658
This section is referenced in § 43-106, § 43-107, § 43-108, and § 43-128.
1981 Ed., § 27-101.
1973 Ed., § 27-101.